Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
76-2226
Real Property
Appraiser Fund; created; use; investment.

There
is hereby created the Real Property Appraiser Fund. The board may use the
fund for the administration and enforcement of the Real Property Appraiser
Act and to meet the necessary expenditures of the board. The fund shall include
a sufficient cash fund balance as determined by the board. The expense of
administering and enforcing the act shall not exceed the money collected by
the board under the act. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Real Property Appraiser Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 26;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 27;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 78;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 46;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 9;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 53.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.